resources_js/ar_SA/aspell/ar_affix.dat
# IVSuff-|nh
SFX g Y 7
SFX g 0 نهن .
SFX g 0 نني .
SFX g 0 نهما .
SFX g 0 نها .
SFX g 0 نه .
SFX g 0 ننا .
SFX g 0 نهم .

# FWSuff-hu-he
SFX f Y 5
SFX f 0 هما .
SFX f 0 ها .
SFX f 0 ه .
SFX f 0 هن .
SFX f 0 هم .

# IVSuff-wA
SFX e Y 1
SFX e 0 وا .

# IVSuff-h
SFX d Y 5
SFX d 0 هما .
SFX d 0 ها .
SFX d 0 ه .
SFX d 0 هن .
SFX d 0 هم .

# PVSuff-n
SFX c Y 2
SFX c 0 ن .
SFX c 0 نا .

# FWSuff-ya
SFX b Y 1
SFX b 0 ي .

# IVSuff-awh
SFX a Y 7
SFX a 0 ونا .
SFX a 0 وها .
SFX a 0 وه .
SFX a 0 وني .
SFX a 0 وهم .
SFX a 0 وهن .
SFX a 0 وهما .

# NSuff-iy
SFX ` Y 1
SFX ` 0 ي .

# PVSuff-awh
SFX _ Y 11
SFX _ 0 ونا .
SFX _ 0 وكن .
SFX _ 0 وها .
SFX _ 0 وني .
SFX _ 0 وكما .
SFX _ 0 وهم .
SFX _ 0 وهن .
SFX _ 0 وهما .
SFX _ 0 وه .
SFX _ 0 وك .
SFX _ 0 وكم .

# NSuff-tay
SFX ^ Y 11
SFX ^ 0 تيكم .
SFX ^ 0 تيهما .
SFX ^ 0 تيه .
SFX ^ 0 تيك .
SFX ^ 0 تيكما .
SFX ^ 0 تينا .
SFX ^ 0 تيكن .
SFX ^ 0 تيهن .
SFX ^ 0 تي .
SFX ^ 0 تيهم .
SFX ^ 0 تيها .

# PVSuff-ath
SFX ] Y 22
SFX ] 0 تاكم .
SFX ] 0 تاه .
SFX ] 0 تانا .
SFX ] 0 تاني .
SFX ] 0 تهن .
SFX ] 0 تني .
SFX ] 0 تنا .
SFX ] 0 ته .
SFX ] 0 تهم .
SFX ] 0 تاها .
SFX ] 0 تاكما .
SFX ] 0 تها .
SFX ] 0 تاهما .
SFX ] 0 تاهن .
SFX ] 0 تاكن .
SFX ] 0 تهما .
SFX ] 0 تاهم .
SFX ] 0 تكما .
SFX ] 0 تاك .
SFX ] 0 تكم .
SFX ] 0 تكن .
SFX ] 0 تك .

# CVSuff-yh
SFX [ Y 7
SFX [ 0 يهن .
SFX [ 0 يني .
SFX [ 0 يهما .
SFX [ 0 ينا .
SFX [ 0 يهم .
SFX [ 0 يه .
SFX [ 0 يها .

# PVSuff-t
SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z 0 تما .
SFX Z 0 تن .
SFX Z 0 تم .
SFX Z 0 ت .

# FWSuff-hu-him
SFX Y Y 5
SFX Y 0 هما .
SFX Y 0 ها .
SFX Y 0 ه .
SFX Y 0 هن .
SFX Y 0 هم .

# FWSuff-nA-we
SFX X Y 1
SFX X 0 نا .

# FWSuff-hi
SFX W Y 5
SFX W 0 هما .
SFX W 0 ها .
SFX W 0 ه .
SFX W 0 هن .
SFX W 0 هم .

# IVSuff-awnk
SFX V Y 4
SFX V 0 ونكم .
SFX V 0 ونك .
SFX V 0 ونكما .
SFX V 0 ونكن .

# IVSuff-wh
SFX U Y 7
SFX U 0 ونا .
SFX U 0 وها .
SFX U 0 وه .
SFX U 0 وني .
SFX U 0 وهم .
SFX U 0 وهن .
SFX U 0 وهما .

# CVSuff-y
SFX T Y 1
SFX T 0 ي .

# PVSuff-~th
SFX S Y 32
SFX S 0 كما .
SFX S 0 موهما .
SFX S 0 هن .
SFX S 0 نه .
SFX S 0 مونا .
SFX S 0 ك .
SFX S 0 ماها .
SFX S 0 ماهما .
SFX S 0 نهن .
SFX S 0 نني .
SFX S 0 نهما .
SFX S 0 هم .
SFX S 0 ماهن .
SFX S 0 ننا .
SFX S 0 مانا .
SFX S 0 كم .
SFX S 0 موها .
SFX S 0 ماهم .
SFX S 0 موني .
SFX S 0 هما .
SFX S 0 ه .
SFX S 0 نا .
SFX S 0 موهن .
SFX S 0 نهم .
SFX S 0 ماه .
SFX S 0 كن .
SFX S 0 موهم .
SFX S 0 نها .
SFX S 0 ني .
SFX S 0 ها .
SFX S 0 موه .
SFX S 0 ماني .

# IVSuff-|h
SFX R Y 7
SFX R 0 ني .
SFX R 0 هما .
SFX R 0 ها .
SFX R 0 ه .
SFX R 0 نا .
SFX R 0 هن .
SFX R 0 هم .

# PVSuff-|h
SFX Q Y 11
SFX Q 0 كما .
SFX Q 0 كم .
SFX Q 0 كن .
SFX Q 0 هن .
SFX Q 0 هم .
SFX Q 0 ني .
SFX Q 0 هما .
SFX Q 0 ه .
SFX Q 0 ها .
SFX Q 0 ك .
SFX Q 0 نا .

# NSuff-Ah
SFX P Y 12
SFX P 0 اي .
SFX P 0 ا .
SFX P 0 اكم .
SFX P 0 اه .
SFX P 0 اهم .
SFX P 0 اهن .
SFX P 0 اها .
SFX P 0 اكن .
SFX P 0 اهما .
SFX P 0 انا .
SFX P 0 اكما .
SFX P 0 اك .

# FWSuff-~iy
SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 ي .

# PVSuff-at
SFX N Y 2
SFX N 0 تا .
SFX N 0 ت .

# IVSuff-wn
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 ون .

# FWSuff-iy-me
SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0 ي .

# NSuff-ayn
SFX K Y 1
SFX K 0 ين .

# PVSuff-uwh
SFX J Y 11
SFX J 0 ونا .
SFX J 0 وكن .
SFX J 0 وها .
SFX J 0 وني .
SFX J 0 وكما .
SFX J 0 وهم .
SFX J 0 وهن .
SFX J 0 وهما .
SFX J 0 وه .
SFX J 0 وك .
SFX J 0 وكم .

# FWSuff-A
SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 ا .

# NSuff-wh
SFX H Y 12
SFX H 0 ونا .
SFX H 0 و .
SFX H 0 وكن .
SFX H 0 وها .
SFX H 0 وكما .
SFX H 0 وهم .
SFX H 0 وهن .
SFX H 0 وهما .
SFX H 0 ي .
SFX H 0 وه .
SFX H 0 وك .
SFX H 0 وكم .

# IVSuff-awA
SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 وا .

# IVSuff-awn
SFX F Y 1
SFX F 0 ون .

# NSuff-AF
SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 ا .
